Missouri, session 2026, HB2804.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.050, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 590.050, to read as follows:
590.050. 1. (1) The POST commission shall establish requirements for the
continuing education of all peace officers.
(2) Peace officers who make traffic stops shall be required to receive three hours of
training within the law enforcement continuing education three-year reporting period
concerning the prohibition against racial profiling and such training shall promote
understanding and respect for racial and cultural differences and the use of effective,
noncombative methods for carrying out law enforcement duties in a racially and culturally
diverse environment.
(3) All peace officers shall be required to receive one hour of continuing
education training each year concerning autism sensitivity that shall include instruction
on identifying signs of Autism Spectrum Disorder (ASD) and how to effectively interact
with people with ASD. Such training, which may be completed virtually, shall be
included as part of the annual continuing education hours required by the POST
commission and shall not be in addition to any such requirements.
2. The director shall license continuing education providers and may probate, suspend
and revoke such licenses upon written notice stating the reasons for such action. Any person
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2804 2
aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this subsection may appeal as provided in
chapter 536.
3. The costs of continuing law enforcement education shall be reimbursed in part by
moneys from the peace officer standards and training commission fund created in section
590.178, subject to availability of funds, except that no such funds shall be used for the
training of any person not actively commissioned or employed by a county or municipal law
enforcement agency.
4. The director may engage in any activity intended to further the professionalism of
peace officers through training and education, including the provision of specialized training
through the department of public safety.
✔